Massachusetts, session 194th, H2234.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or specific law to the contrary, the Secretary
of Health and Human Services, or a designee, shall establish and implement five regional pilot
programs to examine alternative models for transport of behavioral health patients that are
geographically dispersed across the state. The programs shall be designed to promote the use of
non-emergency medical transport for transporting individuals in need of behavioral health
intervention. In designing the pilot, the executive office of health and human services shall
consult with existing hospital-based providers of alternative behavioral health treatment.
MassHealth and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations,
behavioral health management firms, and third-party administrators under contract to a Medicaid
managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide reimbursement for non-
emergency medical transport for behavioral health patients provided by pilot participants.
of 2

SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the health
policy commission, in collaboration with the center for health information and analysis and the
executive office of health and human services, shall collect data and study the effectiveness of
the pilot, including differences in transfer times for behavioral health patients, non-stigmatized
treatment of behavioral health patients, and cost-effectiveness and appropriate use of resources
of this alternative method of transportation as compared to traditional non-emergency medical
transport by ambulance. Such an analysis shall examine MassHealth reimbursement of these
services under the pilot program and make recommendations on setting reimbursement for these
services in the Medicaid and commercial markets.
of 2